Hawaii, session 2026, HB2070.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 201H-31, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§201H-31[]]  Criteria. (a)  In administering this chapter and other laws of the State applicable to the supplying of housing or the assistance in obtaining housing, the corporation shall give preference to those applicants most in need of assistance in obtaining housing, in light of the amount of moneys available for the various programs.  In doing so, the corporation shall take into consideration the applicant's household income and number of dependents; the age of the applicant; the physical disabilities of the applicant or those living with the applicant; whether or not the present housing of the applicant is below standard; whether or not the applicant's need for housing has arisen by reason of displacement of the applicant by governmental actions; the proximity between the housing location and the applicant's place of employment; whether the applicant is a state or county employee; whether the applicant is a returning resident who left the State to attend a university, college, or trade school and has graduated within the past two years; and other factors as it may deem pertinent. The corporation may allow households with incomes up to twenty per cent higher than the income on which the maximum sales price was based to qualify to purchase a unit. (b)  For any project developed or administered by the corporation under this chapter, the corporation, when feasible, shall set aside as a matter of preference no less than       per cent of the available units for state or county employees. (c)  In implementing this section, the corporation shall: (1)  Determine the order of preferences pursuant to subsection (a) and rank each applicant accordingly; (2)  Select applicants based on application date within the pool of similarly ranked applicants; and (3)  Validate the preference status of an applicant before occupancy of an affordable unit. (d)  The corporation may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to establish additional eligibility criteria." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ By Request